Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF499.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 148.212, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Issuance. Upon receipt of the applicable licensure or reregistration fee and permit fee, and in accordance with rules of the board, the board may issue a nonrenewable temporary permit to practice professional or practical nursing to an applicant for licensure or reregistration who is not the subject of a pending investigation or disciplinary action, nor disqualified for any other reason, under the following circumstances: (a) The applicant for licensure by endorsement under section 148.211, subdivision 2, is currently licensed to practice professional or practical nursing in another state, territory, or Canadian province. The permit is valid until the date of board action on the application or for deleted text begin 60deleted text end new text begin 90new text end days, whichever comes first. (b) The applicant for licensure by endorsement under section 148.211, subdivision 2, or for reregistration under section 148.231, subdivision 5, is currently registered in a formal, structured refresher course or its equivalent for nurses that includes clinical practice.